Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.100

Territorial jurisdiction—Process—Limitation.

(1) Every district judge having authority to hear a particular case may issue criminal process in and to any place in the state.

(2) Every district judge having authority to hear a particular case may issue civil process, including writs of execution, attachment, garnishment, and replevin, in and to any place as permitted by statute or rule. This statute does not authorize service of process pursuant to RCW 4.28.180 in actions filed pursuant to chapter 12.40 RCW, except in actions brought against an owner under chapter 59.18 RCW, or in civil infraction matters.

[ 2011 c 132 s 3; 1998 c 73 s 1; 1987 c 442 s 1101; 1984 c 258 s 701; 1961 c 299 s 121.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Issuance of process

infractions generally: RCW 7.80.020.

natural resource infractions: RCW 7.84.120.

traffic infractions: RCW 46.63.130.